FST/sah/phonetize.xfst
define cons1 й;
define cons2 л;
define cons3 с|а;

define buffer I -> д || cons1 _,, I -> л || cons2 _,, I -> т || cons3 _;

regex %+N -> 0,,
        %+SG -> 0,,
        %+PL -> л а р,,
        %+PSS1S -> б ы,,
        %+PSS2S -> г ы,,
        %+PSS3S -> т ы,,
        %+NOM -> 0,,
        %+LOC -> д а,,
        %+PRT -> т а,,
        %+DAT -> г а,,
        %+ABL -> т а н,,
        %+INS -> н а н,,
        %+COM -> т ы ы н,,
        %+COMPV -> д а а ҕ а р,,

        %+VCVB -> 0,,
        %+COND -> 0,,
        %+NEG -> б а,,
        %+1%+SG -> I а р б ы н,,
        %+1%+PL -> I а р б ы т,,
        %+2%+SG -> I а р г ы н,,
        %+2%+PL -> I а р г ы т,,
        %+3%+SG -> д а р,,
        %+3%+PL -> д а р д а р;
